Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1233
Class 1 and 2 motorboats; lights required; enumerated.

Under the conditions described in section 37-1232, every vessel of Classes 1 and 2 propelled by machinery shall carry the following lights:

(1) A lantern or flashlight;

(2) A combined lantern in the forepart of the vessel and lower than the white light aft, showing green to starboard and red to port side, each showing an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of one hundred twelve and five-tenths degrees and so fixed as to show the light from right ahead to twenty-two and five-tenths degrees abaft the beam on its respective side; and

(3) A white light aft which shall show all around the horizon.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 33;

Laws 1989, LB 169, § 1.